test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lyekaTS_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - лека: # Noun 'hoof rot /(fin) kaviotauti' - partial paradigm /Type 15 a→i/
     лека+N+Sg+Nom: лека
     лека+N+Sg+Acc: лекамʼ
     лека+N+Sg+Gen: лекаʼ
     лека+N+Sg+Dat: леканʼ
     лека+N+Sg+Loc: лекахана
     лека+N+Sg+Abl: лекахад
     лека+N+Sg+Pros: лекавна
     лека+N+Du+Nom: лекахаʼ
     лека+N+Du+Acc: лекахаʼ
     лека+N+Du+Gen: лекахаʼ
     лека+N+Pl+Nom: лекаˮ
     лека+N+Pl+Acc: лекы
     лека+N+Pl+Gen: лекыˮ
     лека+N+Pl+Dat: лекахаˮ
     лека+N+Pl+Loc: лекахаˮна
     лека+N+Pl+Abl: лекахат
     лека+N+Pl+Pros: лекыˮмана
     лека+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [лекав, леками]
#     лека+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: леками #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     лека+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [лекав, леками]
#     лека+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: леками #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     лека+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [лекан, лекани]
#     лека+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: лекани #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     лека+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [лекахан, лекахани]
#     лека+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: лекахани #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     лека+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [лекаханан, лекаханани]
#     лека+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: лекаханани #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     лека+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [лекахадан, лекахадани, лекахадни]
#     лека+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [лекахадани, лекахадни] #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     лека+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [лекавнан, лекавнани]
#     лека+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: лекавнани #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     лека+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: [лекахаюн, лекахаюни]
#     лека+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: лекахаюни #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     лека+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: [лекахаюн, лекахаюни]
#     лека+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: лекахаюни #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     лека+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: [лекахаюн, лекахаюни]
#     лека+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: лекахаюни #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     лека+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [лекын, лекыни]
#     лека+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: лекыни #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     лека+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [лекын, лекыни]
#     лека+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: лекыни #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     лека+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: [лекыˮн, лекыˮни]
#     лека+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: лекыˮни #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     лека+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: [лекахаˮн, лекахаˮни]
#     лека+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: лекахаˮни #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     лека+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: [лекахаˮнан, лекахаˮнани]
#     лека+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: лекахаˮнани #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     лека+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [лекахатан, лекахатани, лекахатни]
#     лека+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [лекахатани, лекахатни] #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     лека+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: [лекыˮманан, лекыˮманани]
#     лека+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: лекыˮманани #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     лека+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: лекар
     лека+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: лекамд
     лека+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: леканд
     лека+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: лекаханд
     лека+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: лекахананд
     лека+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: лекахаданд
     лека+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: лекавнанд
     лека+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: лекахаюд
     лека+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: лекахаюд
     лека+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: лекахают
     лека+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: лекыд
     лека+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: лекыд
     лека+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: лекыт
     лека+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: лекахат
     лека+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: лекахаˮнат
     лека+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: лекахатат
     лека+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: лекыˮманат
     лека+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: лекада
     лека+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: лекамда
     лека+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: леканда
     лека+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: лекаханда
     лека+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: лекахананда
     лека+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: лекахаданда
     лека+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: лекавнанда
     лека+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: лекахаюда
     лека+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: лекахаюда
     лека+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: лекахаюта
     лека+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: лекыда
     лека+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: лекыда
     лека+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: лекыта
     лека+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: лекахата
     лека+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: лекахаˮната
     лека+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [лекахатата, лекахатта]
     лека+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: лекыˮманата
     лека+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: лекамиʼ
     лека+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: лекамиʼ
     лека+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: леканиʼ
     лека+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: лекаханиʼ
     лека+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: лекахананиʼ
     лека+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: [лекахаданиʼ, лекахадниʼ]
     лека+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: лекавнаниʼ
     лека+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: лекахаюниʼ
     лека+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: лекахаюниʼ
     лека+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: лекахаюниʼ
     лека+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: лекыниʼ
     лека+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: лекыниʼ
     лека+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: лекыˮниʼ
     лека+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: лекахаˮниʼ
     лека+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: лекахаˮнаниʼ
     лека+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: [лекахатаниʼ, лекахатниʼ]
     лека+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: лекыˮмананиʼ
     лека+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: лекариʼ
     лека+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: лекамдиʼ
     лека+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: лекандиʼ
     лека+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: лекахандиʼ
     лека+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: лекаханандиʼ
     лека+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: лекахадандиʼ
     лека+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: лекавнандиʼ
     лека+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: лекахаюдиʼ
     лека+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: лекахаюдиʼ
     лека+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: лекахаютиʼ
     лека+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: лекыдиʼ
     лека+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: лекыдиʼ
     лека+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: лекытиʼ
     лека+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: лекахатиʼ
     лека+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: лекахаˮнатиʼ
     лека+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: [лекахататиʼ, лекахаттиʼ]
     лека+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: лекыˮманатиʼ
     лека+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: лекадиʼ
     лека+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: лекамдиʼ
     лека+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: лекандиʼ
     лека+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: лекахандиʼ
     лека+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: лекаханандиʼ
     лека+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: лекахадандиʼ
     лека+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: лекавнандиʼ
     лека+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: лекахаюдиʼ
     лека+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: лекахаюдиʼ
     лека+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: лекахаютиʼ
     лека+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: лекыдиʼ
     лека+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: лекыдиʼ
     лека+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: лекытиʼ
     лека+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: лекахатиʼ
     лека+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: лекахаˮнатиʼ
     лека+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: [лекахататиʼ, лекахаттиʼ]
     лека+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: лекыˮманатиʼ
     лека+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: лекаваˮ
     лека+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: лекаваˮ
     лека+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: леканаˮ
     лека+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: лекаханаˮ
     лека+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: лекахананаˮ
     лека+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: [лекахаданаˮ, лекахаднаˮ]
     лека+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: лекавнанаˮ
     лека+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: лекахаюнаˮ
     лека+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: лекахаюнаˮ
     лека+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: лекахаюнаˮ
     лека+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: лекынаˮ
     лека+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: лекынаˮ
     лека+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: лекыˮнаˮ
     лека+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: лекахаˮнаˮ
     лека+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: лекахаˮнанаˮ
     лека+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: [лекахатанаˮ, лекахатнаˮ]
     лека+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: лекыˮмананаˮ
     лека+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: лекараˮ
     лека+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: лекамдаˮ
     лека+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: лекандаˮ
     лека+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: лекахандаˮ
     лека+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: лекаханандаˮ
     лека+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: лекахадандаˮ
     лека+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: лекавнандаˮ
     лека+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: лекахаюдаˮ
     лека+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: лекахаюдаˮ
     лека+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: лекахаютаˮ
     лека+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: лекыдаˮ
     лека+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: лекыдаˮ
     лека+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: лекытаˮ
     лека+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: лекахатаˮ
     лека+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: лекахаˮнатаˮ
     лека+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: [лекахататаˮ, лекахаттаˮ]
     лека+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: лекыˮманатаˮ
     лека+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: лекадоʼ
     лека+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: лекамдоʼ
     лека+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: лекандоʼ
     лека+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: лекахандоʼ
     лека+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: лекаханандоʼ
     лека+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: лекахадандоʼ
     лека+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: лекавнандоʼ
     лека+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: лекахаюдоʼ
     лека+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: лекахаюдоʼ
     лека+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: лекахаютоʼ
     лека+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: лекыдоʼ
     лека+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: лекыдоʼ
     лека+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: лекытоʼ
     лека+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: лекахатоʼ
     лека+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: лекахаˮнатоʼ
     лека+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: [лекахататоʼ, лекахаттоʼ]
     лека+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: лекыˮманатоʼ
     лека+N+Pred+Abs: лекад
     лека+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [лекадав, лекадув, лекадами]
#     лека+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: лекадами #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     лека+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [лекадав, лекадув, лекадами]
#     лека+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: лекадами #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     лека+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: [лекадан, лекадани]
#     лека+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: лекадани #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     лека+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: лекадар
     лека+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: лекадамд
     лека+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: лекаданд
     лека+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: лекадада
     лека+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: лекадамда
     лека+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: лекаданда
     лека+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: лекадамиʼ
     лека+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: лекадамиʼ
     лека+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: лекаданиʼ
     лека+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: лекадариʼ
     лека+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: лекадамдиʼ
     лека+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: лекадандиʼ
     лека+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: лекададиʼ
     лека+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: лекадамдиʼ
     лека+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: лекадандиʼ
     лека+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: лекадаваˮ
     лека+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: лекадаваˮ
     лека+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: лекаданаˮ
     лека+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: лекадараˮ
     лека+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: лекадамдаˮ
     лека+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: лекадандаˮ
     лека+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: лекададоʼ
     лека+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: лекадамдоʼ
     лека+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: лекадандоʼ
     лека+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: лекадмʼ
     лека+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: лекан
     лека+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: лека
     лека+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: леканиʼ
     лека+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: лекадиʼ
     лека+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: лекахаʼ
     лека+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: лекаваˮ
     лека+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: лекадаˮ
     лека+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: лекаˮ
     лека+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: лекадамзь
     лека+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: леканась
     лека+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: лекась
     лека+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: леканинзь
     лека+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: лекадинзь
     лека+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: лекаханзь
     лека+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: лекаваць
     лека+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: лекадаць
     лека+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: лекаць
     лека+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: лекав
     лека+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: лекар
     лека+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: лекада
     лека+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: лекамиʼ
     лека+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: лекариʼ
     лека+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: лекадиʼ
     лека+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: лекаваˮ
     лека+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: лекараˮ
     лека+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: лекадоʼ
     лека+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: лекавась
     лека+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: лекарась
     лека+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: лекадась
     лека+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: лекаминзь
     лека+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: лекаринзь
     лека+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: лекадинзь
     лека+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: лекаваць
     лека+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: лекараць
     лека+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: лекадонзь
     лека+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: лекахаюн
     лека+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: лекахаюд
     лека+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: лекахаюда
     лека+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: лекахаюниʼ
     лека+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: лекахаюдиʼ
     лека+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: лекахаюдиʼ
     лека+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: лекахаюнаˮ
     лека+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: лекахаюдаˮ
     лека+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: лекахаюдоʼ
     лека+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: лекахаюнась
     лека+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: лекахаюдась
     лека+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: лекахаюдась
     лека+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: лекахаюнинзь
     лека+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: лекахаюдинзь
     лека+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: лекахаюдинзь
     лека+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: лекахаюнаць
     лека+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: лекахаюдаць
     лека+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: лекахаюдонзь
     лека+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: лекын
     лека+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: лекыд
     лека+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: лекыда
     лека+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: лекыниʼ
     лека+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: лекыдиʼ
